California statutes. Public Resources Code
The legislative body may fix a date, not more than two years from the date of issuance, for the earliest maturity of each issue or series of bonds. Beginning with the date of the earliest maturity of each issue or series, not less than one-fortieth of the indebtedness of such issue or series shall be paid every year; provided, however, the bonds of any issue or series may be made to mature and become payable in approximately equal total annual installments of interest and principal, during the term of the bonds computed from the first year in which any part of the principal shall mature to the date of final maturity, which annual installments may vary one from the other in amounts not exceeding in any year more than 5 percent of the total principal amount of the bonds of such issue or of the series thereof then proposed to be issued. The final maturity date shall not exceed 40 years from the time of incurring the indebtedness evidenced by each issue or series.

The bonds shall be payable at a place to be fixed by the legislative body and designated in the bonds, together with the interest on all sums unpaid on such date, interest to be paid semiannually, except that interest for the first year after the date of the bonds may be made payable at the end of said year, until the whole of the indebtedness shall have been paid. The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the city treasurer in the manner provided by law for the payment of bonds of the city. Such bonds shall not be an obligation of the municipality issuing them but shall be payable from the funds of the district as herein provided and neither the municipality nor any officer thereof shall be holden for payment otherwise of their principal and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5362.

The bonds shall be issued in such denomination as the legislative body may determine, except that no bonds shall be of a less denomination than one hundred dollars ($100), nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall be signed by the chief executive of the municipality, or by such other officer thereof as the legislative body of the municipality shall, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of all its members, authorize and designate for that purpose, and also signed by the treasurer thereof, and shall be countersigned by the clerk. The interest coupons on said bonds shall be numbered consecutively and signed by the treasurer of such municipality by his engraved or lithographed signature. In case any such officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

The legislative body may issue and sell the bonds at not less than par value, and the proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the municipality to the credit of the proper district funds and shall be applied exclusively to the purposes and objects mentioned in the ordinance or resolution ordering the holding of the bond election and to the incidental expense in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.1.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5364.

The legislative body of the city shall, at the time of fixing the general tax levy, and in the manner for the general tax levy, levy and collect a tax each year upon the taxable land in the district sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds for that year, and such portion of the principal as is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy; provided, however, that if the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of such bonds be made to begin more than one year after the date of issue, such tax shall be levied and collected, each year sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity. The tax shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for municipal purposes and when collected shall be paid into the treasury of the city and be used for the payment of the principal and interest on such bonds and for no other purpose.

The legislative body may provide, in the resolution or ordinance calling the election, that the tax to pay principal and interest on the bonds provided for in this section shall be levied and collected upon all taxable property in the district rather than on taxable land. If the proposition submitted pursuant to such resolution or ordinance is approved as provided in Section 5359, the tax shall be levied as provided in such ordinance or resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.

All contracts for the construction or completion of any work or improvement, or for furnishing labor, materials or supplies shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The legislative body shall advertise in the city pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code, inviting sealed proposals for furnishing labor, materials and supplies for the proposed improvement before any contract shall be made; provided, however, that if chartered the city shall follow its charter as to making of contracts. The legislative body shall have the right to require such bonds as it may deem best from the successful bidder to insure the faithful performance of the contract, and shall also have the right to reject any and all bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

5366.

The State Contract Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code) and Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division 2 of the Labor Code shall be applicable to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 570.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5367.

The municipality shall have full power and authority to expend the proceeds acquired from the sale of bonds for the acquisition or construction of the improvement or work set forth in the ordinance calling the election, and shall also have full power and authority to acquire or construct the improvements or works, and the improvements or works so acquired or constructed shall be the property of the municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5368.

Any district formed under the provisions of this article shall be known as Municipal Park Improvement District No. ____ (insert number) of the City of ____ (inserting the name of the municipality in which the district is located).

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5368.5.

Any property in the municipality within which the municipal park improvement district is formed may be annexed to such district in the manner provided in Part 11 (commencing with Section 72670) of Division 20 of the Water Code, applicable to municipal water district improvement districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5369.

This article shall not affect any other act or acts relating to the same, or a similar subject, but it is intended to provide an alternative method of procedure governing the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under the provisions of this article, its provisions and none other shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------

5370.

The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose thereof and no provision shall be deemed or construed to prohibit the inclusion within the boundaries of any district formed under the provisions of this article, or any other act, of any territory which has or which may be included within any other district formed under the provisions of this article, or any other act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1796.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Protection of County Parks [5380. - 5380.]

5380.

The board of supervisors, in order to protect county parks from damage and preserve the peace therein, may confer on the county officer in charge of its parks, and on other uniformed park employees which it may designate, the authority to issue citations in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5b (commencing with Section 853.1) and Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.6), Title 3, Part 2 of the Penal Code, for misdemeanor violations of laws of this state and ordinances of a city or county committed within a county park and within their presence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Interpretive Services [5385. - 5386.]

5385.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Eligible entity” means any of the following:

(1) A qualified nonprofit public benefit corporation organized pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code with the mission of increasing equity in outdoor access.

(2) A federally recognized Native American tribe.

(3) A California Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(b) “Interpretive services” means activities and programs that seek to help participating park visitors to understand and connect with natural, cultural, and historic resources of a local park and are not generally offered by the local entity.

(c) “Local entity” means a city, county, or city and county that owns, maintains, or operates a local park.

(d) “Local park” means a beach or park that is owned, maintained, or operated by a local entity and that is not part of the state or federal park
 systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (AB 2939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5386.

(a) Use of a local park by an eligible entity to provide interpretive services to no more than 30 participating park visitors at once shall be considered an allowable public use of the local park, and shall be treated by the local entity in the same manner as general public use of the local park, provided that the local entity does not confer on the eligible entity any benefit not conferred on the general public.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local entity may adopt requirements that apply to an eligible
 entity that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) if the governing body of the local entity adopts a finding, supported by substantial evidence, of one or more of the following:

(1) The requirements are necessary to ensure that public access to a local park, or the protection of environmental resources, is not significantly negatively impaired by an eligible entity that meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(2) The requirements will further access to a local park by an eligible entity that meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(3) The requirements are necessary to address the local entity’s liability related to a visit to a local park by an eligible entity that meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (AB 2939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Preservation of Public Parks [5400. - 5409.]

5400.

This chapter shall be known as the Public Park Preservation Act of 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5400.5.

As used in this chapter “public park” includes only a park operated by a public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5400.6.

As used in this chapter “operating entity” means the entity owning the park land and the facilities thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5401.

(a) No city, city and county, county, public district, or agency of the state, including any division, department or agency of the state government, or public utility, shall acquire (by purchase, exchange, condemnation, or otherwise) any real property, which property is in use as a public park at the time of such acquisition, for the purpose of utilizing such property for any nonpark purpose, unless the acquiring entity pays or transfers to the legislative body of the entity operating the park sufficient compensation or land, or both, as required by the provisions of this chapter to enable the operating entity to replace the park land and the facilities thereon.

(b) Where the operating entity and the acquiring entity are one and the same, the entity is subject to the provisions of this chapter pertaining to both operating and acquiring entities, and the entity is, as acquiring entity, required to make funds or land, or both, available pursuant to Section 5405 or 5407.2, and, as operating entity, required to acquire or improve park lands and facilities pursuant to Sections 5404, 5407, 5407.1, and 5407.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the acquisition of real property or any interest in real property for the construction or maintenance of underground utility services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to a public utility, whether privately or publicly owned, acquiring real property or an interest in real property for the purpose of providing services to the public park, if it is not feasible to place the utility services or facility underground.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.5.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to a public utility, whether privately or publicly owned, acquiring real property or any interest in real property as a waterway; provided, that the legislative body of the operating entity determines by a majority vote that such waterway would preserve or enhance the recreational or aesthetic values of the park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5404.

In the event that the park land and facilities are acquired, the operating entity shall acquire substitute park land and facilities. If, however, less than 10 percent of the park land, but not more than one acre, is acquired, the operating entity may, instead of acquiring substitute park land and facilities, improve the unacquired portion of the park land and facilities, using the funds received for this purpose, after holding a public hearing on the matter and upon a majority vote of its legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.

Unless the provisions of Section 5407.2 are applicable, the amount of compensation or land, or both, required by this chapter for the taking of the park land and facilities shall be equal to one of the following:

(a) The cost of acquiring substitute park land of comparable characteristics and of substantially equal size located in an area which would allow for use of the substitute park land and facilities by generally the same persons who used the existing park land and facilities, and the cost of acquiring substitute facilities of the same type and number, plus the cost of development of such substitute park land, including the placing of such substitute facilities thereon.

(b) Substitute park land of comparable characteristics and of substantially equal size located in an area which would allow for use of the substitute park land by generally the same persons who used the existing park land, and the cost of acquiring substitute facilities of the same type and number, plus the cost of development of such substitute park land, including the placing of such substitute facilities thereon.

(c) Any combination of substitute park land and compensation in an amount sufficient to provide substitute park land of comparable characteristics and of substantially equal size located in an area which would allow for use of the substitute park land and facilities by generally the same persons who used the existing park land and facilities, and to provide substitute facilities of the same type and number, plus the cost of development of such substitute park land, including the placing of such substitute facilities thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5406.

Upon receiving an offer of compensation or land, or both, from the acquiring entity for the acquisition of the park, the legislative body of the operating entity may enter into an agreement with the acquiring entity to the effect that the acquiring entity has complied with the requirements of Section 5405 or Section 5407.2 in determining the amount of compensation or land, or both. Such agreement may be entered into only after a public hearing, except where less than 10 percent of the total area of a state park is acquired, in which case the operating entity shall follow the procedure it adopts for such purposes. Within 45 days of the public hearing, due notice shall be conspicuously posted at the park being acquired, including along its exterior boundaries, at all entrances, and on the recreation building, if any exists. Any resident of the operating entity may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the park is located for determination of whether such agreement complies with the requirements of Section 5405 or Section 5407.2. If no such agreement has been entered into within six months after the receipt of such offer, either party may submit a proposal for compensation or land, or both, to the superior court of the county in which the park to be acquired is located for the determination of proper compensation. The court may reject any such proposal as not meeting the requirements of Section 5405 or Section 5407.2. The court may approve only one proposal as meeting such requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.

Unless improvement of an unacquired portion of the park land and facilities is undertaken pursuant to Section 5404, all funds, or land and funds received by the operating entity shall be used to obtain or provide substitute park land and facilities in accordance with the provisions of Section 5407.1 or Section 5407.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.1.

Such substitute park land and facilities shall be of comparable characteristics and of substantially equal size located in an area which would allow for use of the substitute park land and facilities by generally the same persons who used the acquired park land and facilities. However, the operating entity, after holding a public hearing, with due notice posted at the park being acquired, and after finding on the basis of evidence submitted at such hearing that there are compelling reasons for acquiring a substitute park of a different character, may, upon the recommendation of the park commission or if none exists, upon the recommendation of the administrative department, unit or agency charged with the responsibility for the maintenance and operation of the park land and facilities, and by a three-fourths vote of its legislative body, provided it is otherwise legally permissible to do so, change the general character of the substitute park land and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5407.2.

The operating entity, after holding a public hearing, with due notice posted at the park being acquired, and after finding on the basis of evidence submitted at such hearing that there is a lack of need for the park in its present location and that there are compelling reasons for acquiring a substitute park in another general location, may, upon the recommendation of the park commission or if none exists, upon the recommendation of the administrative department, unit or agency charged with the responsibility for the maintenance and operation of the park land and facilities, and by a three-fourths vote of its legislative body, provided it is otherwise legally permissible to do so, change the general location of the substitute park land and facilities.

If the legislative body votes to change the general location of the substitute park land and facilities, the amount of compensation or land, or both, for the taking of the park land and facilities shall be determined on the basis of the fair market value of the property taken, considering all the uses for which it is available and adaptable regardless of its dedication to park purposes, plus the value of any and all improvements constructed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5408.

Failure of any public entity or public utility to comply with any provision of this chapter shall not affect the validity of an acquisition by such entity or utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------

5409.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the acquisition of public park property by purchase, exchange, condemnation, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1642.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.6. Public Playground Equipment [5410. - 5411.]

5410.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that playground equipment accessible to and usable by all persons regardless of physical condition is becoming increasingly available. The Legislature further finds and declares that it is a matter of statewide interest and concern that all public agencies providing playgrounds utilize such facilities to the maximum extent possible, and, where feasible, provide playground equipment usable by both able-bodied and physically disabled persons so as to integrate able-bodied and physically disabled persons within such playgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1006.)
-------------------------------------------

5411.

All public agencies operating playgrounds, including state agencies, cities, counties, a city and county, school districts and other districts, shall, with respect to new playground equipment purchased on or after January 1, 1979, provide that a portion of the equipment within the playground is accessible and usable by all persons regardless of their physical condition whenever such equipment is available at a quality and cost which is comparable to the quality and cost of standard equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Districts [5500. - 5598.]



  ARTICLE 3. Regional Park, Park and Open-Space, and Open-Space Districts [5500. - 5595.]

5500.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “District” means any regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district formed pursuant to this article.

(b) “He” or “he or she” means they.

(c) “Him” or “him or her” means them.

(d) “His” or “his or her” means their.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

A district may be created pursuant to, and it may exercise the powers granted by, this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

(a) Three or more cities, together with any parcel or parcels of city or county territory, whether in the same or different counties, may organize and incorporate. All the territory in the proposed district shall be contiguous.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), one or more cities, together with any parcel or parcels of city or county territory, whether in the same or different counties, the territory of all of which when combined has a population of at least 50,000, may organize and incorporate. All the territory in the proposed district shall be contiguous.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

Whenever it is desired to form a district, a petition requesting the creation and maintenance of a district, and describing the exterior boundaries of the proposed district shall be signed by at least 5,000 electors residing within the territory proposed to be included in the district and shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county containing the largest area within the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.5.

(a) In lieu of a petition described in Section 5503, a proposal to form a new district may also be made by the adoption of a resolution of application by the legislative body of any county or city that contains the territory proposed to be included in the district.

(b) The resolution of application shall contain all of the following:

(1) The methods by which the district will be financed, including, but not limited to, special taxes and
 fees.

(2) The proposed name for the district and the reasons for forming it.

(3) A description of the territory to be included in the district.

(c) Before adopting a resolution of application, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the resolution. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the county or
 city and on the city or county’s Internet Web site. At least 20 days before the hearing, the legislative body shall give mailed notice of its hearing to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county. The notice shall generally describe the proposed formation of the district and the territory proposed to be included in the district.

(d) At the hearing, the legislative body shall give any person an opportunity to present his or her views on the resolution of application.

(e) The clerk of the legislative body shall file a certified copy of the resolution of application with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (AB 2600)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5504.

A petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, all of which together shall constitute one petition. Each instrument shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it, certifying that each signature is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be. Every elector signing the petition shall write his address opposite his signature. The clerk of the board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district, shall check and verify the signatures to the petition and certify the result of the examination to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5505.

If the petition contains names of electors residing in a county other than the one having the largest area within the proposed district, and does not contain the requisite number of signatures of electors residing in the county having the largest area within the proposed district, a duplicate original of the petition shall be filed with the board of supervisors of the other county, and the clerk of the board of supervisors of the other county shall likewise check and verify the signatures to the petition and certify the result to the board of supervisors of his county, and thereupon copies of the clerk’s certificates shall be transmitted to each county
 affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.

If the petition contains sufficient signatures of electors residing in the county having the largest area within the proposed district, but the petition includes land within another county or other counties, the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county having the largest area within the proposed district shall transmit a certified copy of the petition and of his certificate to the board of supervisors of the other county or counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.3.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the population of San Diego County continues to grow at an increasing rate, and already the county is far behind other urban areas in the state in providing adequate park, recreational, and open-space facilities for its residents. Formation of a regional district with boundaries coterminous with those of San Diego County is critical to help address the growing and unmet park and recreational needs in San Diego County.

(2) Proceedings for the formation of a regional park and open-space district or a regional open-space district with boundaries coterminous with those of San Diego County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6064 of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and proceedings related to the petition specified in this article.

(b) As used in this section and Sections 5538.3 and 5539.3:

(1) “Regional district” means a district formed pursuant to this section that contains all of the territory within San Diego County, including all incorporated cities.

(2) “Capital outlay project” means the acquisition or improvement of real property, but, for purposes of
 subdivision (c), includes the servicing of bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.3.

(c) The resolution specified in subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the proposed regional district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the regional district. The provisions of this article pertaining to district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the regional district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the regional district.

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the regional district.

(4) Describe the methods by which the regional district will be financed.

(5) (A) Specify that all revenue generated by the regional district, including the proceeds from the issuance of any bonds, shall be allocated among all affected public agencies within the territory of the district, for expenditure consistent with the purposes of this article, to adequately address the needs specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5539.3.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “all affected public agencies” means the County of San Diego, all incorporated cities within the county, and any joint powers authority or agency established for the purpose of acquiring land for park, recreational, open-space, and conservation purposes.

(6) (A) Call and give notice of an election
 to be held in the proposed regional district for the purpose of determining whether the regional district shall be formed.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of San Diego shall prepare the language in the ballot label. The proposition shall specify the matters set forth in the resolution, except for subparagraph (A). The analysis and review of the measure shall be carried out pursuant to Section 9160 of the Elections Code.

(7) State that, in the first 20 years after the date that an assessment is levied pursuant to Section 5539.3, a minimum of 80 percent of all proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district shall be used for capital outlay projects.

(8) Include an expenditure plan consisting of a list of capital outlay projects, including acquisition areas, and a general
 description of proposed outlays for operation and maintenance, to be funded, over a 20-year period from the date on which the assessment is first levied, with proceeds of assessments levied by the regional district.

(9) State the proposed rate and method of apportionment to be used in levying annual assessments for all categories of property.

(10) Include any other matters determined to be necessary by the board of supervisors.

(d) (1) The formation of the regional district is not subject to Section 5517.1 or to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) The regional district shall be formed if a majority of voters voting
 on the proposition vote in favor of formation of the regional district.

(e) (1) No proceeds from any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.3 shall be expended for operation and maintenance. Bond proceeds may be expended to pay all costs incidental to the preparation and issuance of the bonds.

(2) The regional district may use the proceeds from the levy of assessments for the operation and maintenance of capital outlay projects.

(f) The San Diego Association of Governments, serving as the Regional Planning and Growth Management Review Board, should review the expenditure plan for consistency with the open-space element of the Regional Growth Management Strategy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.4.

(a) Proceedings for the formation of a district with boundaries coterminous with those of Napa County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of Napa County adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 5511, in lieu of a petition.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the proposed district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the proposed district shall be governed by a board of five directors who shall be elected in accordance with this article and that no member of the board of supervisors shall be a director.

(3) State that the territory of the proposed district shall include all of the territory within Napa County, including incorporated cities.

(4) Specify the boundaries of the five wards or subdistricts drawn pursuant to Section 5515.

(5) Specify that the district shall not have, and may not exercise, the power of eminent domain pursuant to Section 5542 or any other provision of law.

(6) Describe the methods by which the proposed district will be financed.

(7) Call an election pursuant to Section 5514.

(8) Include any other matters necessary to the formation of the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.5.

(a) If the exterior boundaries of a proposed district are coterminous with the exterior boundaries of the County of Marin or the County of Sonoma, proceedings for formation of that district may, in lieu of a petition, be initiated by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county.

(b) The resolution may specify that the board of supervisors shall act, ex officio, as the governing body for a district formed in Marin County. For a district formed in Sonoma County, the board
 of supervisors shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the district. In those cases, the provisions of this article pertaining to the election of district directors shall not apply and all powers and authority of the district shall be vested in the board of supervisors of the county in its capacity as the governing body of the district.

(c) The resolution adopted by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sonoma shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the district, and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Describe the methods by which the district will be financed.

(3) Call, and give notice of, an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be created and established. The formation of
 the district is not subject to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(4) Include any other matters necessary to the formation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.6.

The governing body of a district formed pursuant to Section 5506.5 may, by resolution, change the legal name of the district to the “Marin County Open Space District” or the “Sonoma County Agricultural Preservation and Open Space District,” as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   Effective June 29, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.7.

(a) Proceedings for the formation of a district in Riverside County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Riverside, in lieu of a petition.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the district and state the reasons for forming it.

(2) Specify that the board of supervisors shall act, ex officio, as the governing body of the district. The provisions of this article pertaining to the
 election of district directors do not apply, and all powers and authority of the district shall be vested in the board of supervisors in its capacity as the governing body of the district.

(3) Describe the territory to be included in the district. Notwithstanding Section 5502, the territory of the district shall consist of at least all unincorporated areas of the county lying west of a north-south line passing through Chiriaco Summit. However, if requested by resolution of the governing body of any city, that city may be included in the district and the description shall reflect its inclusion.

(4) Describe the methods by which the district will be financed.

(5) Call and give notice of an election to be held in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be created and established.
 The election shall be consolidated with a statewide election or any election conducted throughout Riverside County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 789, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.8.

(a) Proceedings for the formation of a regional park and open-space or regional open-space district in San Bernardino County may be initiated by resolution of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Bernardino adopted after a hearing noticed in accordance with Section 6062a of the Government Code, in lieu of the petition and related proceedings specified in this article.

(b) The resolution shall do all of the following:

(1) Name the regional district and state the reasons for forming it.
